Indiana, session 2026, HB1421.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-5-10.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 10.4. Use of Automated Decision System for
Employment Related Decisions
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "automated decision system"
means a system, software, or process, including a system, software,
or process derived from machine learning, statistics, or other data
processing or artificial intelligence techniques, that:
(1) uses computation, in whole or in part, to:
(A) determine outcomes;
(B) make or aid decisions, including through evaluations,
metrics, or scoring;
(C) inform policy implementation; or
(D) collect data or observations; and
(2) is not passive computing infrastructure.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "automated decision system
2026 IN 1421—LS 6608/DI 141


output" means any information, assumption, prediction, score,
recommendation, decision, evaluation, metric, conclusion,
inference, or profile generated by an automated decision system.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "candidate", with respect to an
employer, means an individual who applies or has applied to be
employed by or otherwise perform work for remuneration for the
employer.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "covered individual", with
respect to an employer, means an individual who is:
(1) employed by or otherwise performing work for
remuneration for the employer; or
(2) a candidate with respect to the employer.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "department" refers to the
department of labor created by IC 22-1-1-1.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "employ" has the meaning set
forth in Section 203 of the federal Fair Labor Standards Act of
1938, as amended (29 U.S.C. 203).
Sec. 7. (a) As used in this chapter, "employer" means the
following:
(1) A sole proprietor, corporation, partnership, limited
liability company, or other entity that:
(A) employs; or
(B) otherwise engages for the performance of work for
remuneration;
eleven (11) or more covered individuals.
(2) A state agency (as defined in IC 22-2-20-5).
(3) A political subdivision (as defined in IC 36-1-2-13).
(b) The term includes:
(1) any person who acts, directly or indirectly, in the interest
of an employer in relation to any covered individual
performing work for remuneration for the employer; and
(2) any successor in interest of an employer.
(c) The term does not include a labor organization (as defined
in IC 22-6-6-5), other than when the labor organization acts as an
employer, or anyone acting in the capacity of an officer or agent of
the labor organization.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "employment related decision"
means a decision by an employer with regard to:
(1) hiring a covered individual, including any decision with
regard to recruiting, screening, interviewing, or selecting a
candidate;
(2) firing, retaining, taking a disciplinary action against,
2026 IN 1421—LS 6608/DI 141


demoting, or reassigning duties of a covered individual; or
(3) any other term, condition, or privilege of employment or
work of the covered individual, such as a decision relating to
pay, scheduling, health care or long term care coverage,
benefits, work hours, or the promotion of a covered
individual.
Sec. 9. (a) As used in this chapter, "passive computing
infrastructure" means any intermediary technology that does not:
(1) influence or determine the outcome of a decision;
(2) make or aid in a decision, including through evaluations,
metrics, or scoring;
(3) inform policy implementation; or
(4) collect data or observations.
(b) The term includes web hosting, domain registration,
networking, caching, data storage, or cybersecurity.
Sec. 10. An employer may not:
(1) rely exclusively on an automated decision system in
making an employment related decision with respect to a
covered individual; and
(2) use an automated decision system output in making an
employment related decision with respect to a covered
individual unless:
(A) the automated decision system used to generate the
automated decision system output has had predeployment
testing and validation with respect to:
(i) the efficacy of the system;
(ii) the compliance of the system with applicable
employment discrimination laws, including Title VII of
the Civil Rights Act of 1964 (42 U.S.C. 2000e et seq.), the
Age Discrimination in Employment Act of 1967 (29
U.S.C. 621 et seq.), Title I of the Americans with
Disabilities Act of 1990 (42 U.S.C. 12111 et seq.), Title II
of the Genetic Information Nondiscrimination Act of
2008 (42 U.S.C. 2000ff et seq.), Section 6(d) of the Fair
Labor Standards Act of 1938 (29 U.S.C. 206(d)), Sections
501 and 505 of the Rehabilitation Act of 1973 (29 U.S.C.
791 and 29 U.S.C. 793), and the Pregnant Workers
Fairness Act (42 U.S.C. 2000gg);
(iii) the lack of any potential discriminatory impact of
the system, including discriminatory impact based on
race, color, religion, sex (including pregnancy, sexual
orientation, or gender identity), national origin, age, or
2026 IN 1421—LS 6608/DI 141


disability, and genetic information (including family
medical history); and
(iv) the compliance of the system with the Artificial
Intelligence Risk Management Framework released by
the National Institute of Standards and Technology on
January 26, 2023, or a successor framework;
(B) the automated decision system is, not less than
annually, independently tested for discriminatory impact
described in clause (A)(iii) or potential biases and the
results of the test are made publicly available;
(C) the employer has provided the disclosures required
under section 11 of this chapter with respect to the use of
the automated decision system output;
(D) the use is designed for purposes of making the
employment related decision;
(E) the employer independently corroborates, via
meaningful oversight by a human with appropriate and
relevant experience, the automated decision system output;
(F) not later than seven (7) days after making the
employment related decision, the employer provides full,
accessible, and meaningful documentation in plain
language and at no cost to the covered individual on the
automated decision system output, including:
(i) a description of the automated decision system used to
generate the automated decision system output;
(ii) a description and explanation, in plain language, of
the input date to the automated decision system used to
generate the automated decision system output and a
machine readable copy of the data;
(iii) a description and explanation of how the automated
decision system output was used in making the
employment related decision; and
(iv) the reasoning for the use of the automated decision
system output in the employment related decision; and
(G) the employer allows the covered individual to, after
receiving the documentation described in clause (F):
(i) dispute, in a manner that is accessible, equitable, and
does not pose an unreasonable burden on the covered
individual, the automated decision system output to a
human with appropriate and relevant experience; and
(ii) appeal the employment related decision to a human
with appropriate and relevant experience who is not the
2026 IN 1421—LS 6608/DI 141


human for purposes of the corroboration under clause
(E).
Sec. 11. (a) An employer that uses or intends to use an
automated decision system output in making an employment
related decision with respect to a covered individual shall, in
accordance with subsections (b) and (c), disclose to the covered
individual:
(1) that the employer uses or intends to use an automated
decision system output in making an employment related
decision;
(2) a description and explanation of the automated decision
system used or intended to be used to generate the automated
decision system output, including:
(A) the types of data collected or intended to be collected
as inputs to the automated decision system and the
circumstances of the collection;
(B) the characteristics that the automated decision system
measures or is intended to measure, such as the knowledge,
skills, or abilities of the covered individual;
(C) how the characteristics relate or would relate to any
function required for the work or potential work of the
covered individual;
(D) how the system measures or is intended to measure the
characteristics; and
(E) how the covered individual can interpret the
automated decision system output in plain language;
(3) the identity of the covered individual or entity that
operates the automated decision system that provides the
automated decision system output;
(4) how the employer uses or intends to use the automated
decision system output in making the employment related
decision; and
(5) how the covered individual may dispute or appeal an
employment related decision made with respect to the covered
individual using an automated decision system output.
(b) An employer shall provide the disclosures required by
subsection (a) to a covered individual as follows:
(1) In the case of a covered individual who was hired on or
before July 1, 2026, the disclosure must be provided to the
covered individual not later than August 1, 2026.
(2) In the case of a covered individual who is hired after July
1, 2026, the disclosure must be provided to the covered
2026 IN 1421—LS 6608/DI 141


individual before hiring.
(c) Not later than thirty (30) days after:
(1) any information provided by an employer to a covered
individual through a disclosure required by subsection (a)
significantly changes; or
(2) any significant new information required to be provided
in the disclosure becomes available;
the employer shall provide the covered individual with an updated
disclosure.
Sec. 12. An employer that uses or intends to use an automated
decision system output in making an employment related decision
with respect to a covered individual shall train any individual or
entity that operates the automated decision system or uses the
automated decision system output on:
(1) the input information used by the automated decision
system;
(2) the appeals process for the automated decision system
output;
(3) potential biases in automated decision systems;
(4) any limitations of the automated decision system;
(5) any potential adverse effects to covered individuals due to
the automated decision system;
(6) any potential adverse effects to covered individuals due to
the automated decision system;
(7) any potential errors or problems related to the automated
decision system; and
(8) examples of inappropriate uses of the automated decision
system.
Sec. 13. An employer that manages a covered individual through
an automated decision system shall allow the covered individual to:
(1) opt out of the management through the automated
decision system; and
(2) be managed through a human manager who is able to
make employment related decisions with respect to the
covered individual.
Sec. 14. An employer may not discriminate or retaliate,
including through intimidation, threats, coercion, or harassment,
against any covered individual:
(1) for exercising or attempting to exercise any right provided
under this chapter; or
(2) because the covered individual or another individual
acting at the request of the covered individual has:
2026 IN 1421—LS 6608/DI 141


(A) filed a written or oral complaint to the employer or a
federal, state, or local government entity of a violation of
this chapter;
(B) sought assistance or intervention with respect to a
worker privacy related concern from the employer, a
federal, state, or local government, or a worker
representative;
(C) instituted, caused to be instituted, or otherwise
participated in any inquiry or proceeding under this
chapter;
(D) given, or is about to give, any information in
connection with any inquiry or proceeding relating to any
right provided under this chapter; or
(E) testified, or is about to testify, in any inquiry or
proceeding relating to any right provided under this
chapter.
Sec. 15. (a) The department may do the following:
(1) Receive complaints regarding alleged violations of this
chapter.
(2) Investigate any facts, conditions, practices, or matters as
the department deems necessary or appropriate to determine
whether an employer has violated this chapter.
(3) Require an employer to file with the department, on a
form prescribed by the department, annual or special reports
or answers in writing to specific questions relating to the use
of an automated decision system for employment related
decisions.
(b) If the department requires an employer to file a report or
answers under subsection (a)(3), the employer shall file the report
or answers in the manner and time period required by the
department.
(c) An employer shall maintain, keep, preserve, and make
available to the department records pertaining to compliance with
this chapter.
Sec. 16. (a) Regardless of whether any action is taken by the
department under section 15 of this chapter, a:
(1) covered individual; or
(2) labor organization;
that is adversely affected by an alleged violation of this chapter
may bring a civil action against any person that violates this
chapter.
(b) In a civil action brought under subsection (a) in which the
2026 IN 1421—LS 6608/DI 141


covered individual or labor organization prevails, the court may
award any of the following to the covered individual or labor
organization:
(1) Damages of:
(A) an amount equal to the sum of any actual damages
sustained by the covered individual or labor organization;
or
(B) not more than treble damages.
(2) Statutory damages described in subsection (d).
(3) Injunctive relief.
(4) Equitable relief.
(5) For a civil action regarding a violation of section 14 of this
chapter, temporary relief while the case is pending, including
reinstatement.
(c) In a civil action brought under subsection (a) in which the
covered individual or labor organization prevails, the court shall
award the covered individual or labor organization reasonable
attorney's fees and costs.
(d) The court may, in accordance with subsection (b)(2) and
subject to subsections (e) and (f), award statutory damages against
a person in the following amounts:
(1) For each violation of sections 10 through 13 of this
chapter, the court may award:
(A) damages of at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) and
not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000); or
(B) for any willful or repeated violation by an employer,
damages of at least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and not
more than forty thousand dollars ($40,000).
(2) For each violation of section 14 of this chapter, the court
may award:
(A) damages of at least five thousand dollars ($5,000) and
not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000); or
(B) for any willful or repeated violation, damages of at
least ten thousand dollars ($10,000) and not more than one
hundred thousand dollars ($100,000).
(e) In determining the amount of statutory damages assessed
under subsection (d), the court shall consider any relevant
circumstances presented by the parties to the action, including:
(1) the nature and seriousness of the violation;
(2) the number of violations;
(3) the persistence of the misconduct;
(4) the length of time over which the misconduct occurred;
2026 IN 1421—LS 6608/DI 141


(5) the willfulness of the misconduct; and
(6) the assets, liabilities, and net worth of the employer.
(f) The amounts referred to in subsection (d) must be increased
annually, for fiscal year 2027 and every fiscal year thereafter, by
the percent increase, if any, in the Consumer Price Index for All
Urban Consumers for the most recent twelve (12) month period for
which applicable data is available.
Sec. 17. (a) Before a covered individual or labor organization
brings an action under section 16 of this chapter, the covered
individual or labor organization shall, in writing, notify the
department of the intent to commence the civil action.
(b) Upon receiving notice under subsection (a), the department
shall, not later than sixty (60) days after receiving the notice:
(1) decide whether to intervene in the action; and
(2) notify the covered individual or labor organization of the
department's decision under subdivision (1).
(c) If the department decides to intervene in an action, the court
shall allow the department to do the following upon intervening:
(1) Be heard on all matters arising in the action.
(2) File petitions for appeal of a decision in the action.
Sec. 18. The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
2026 IN 1421—LS 6608/DI 141